Utah statutes.
41-1a-1105.   Records to be kept by public garage, impound lot, or impound
yard.
(1) (a)  Each person engaged in the business of operating a public garage,
impound lot, or impound yard shall keep a record of every vehicle, vessel, or
outboard motor stored in it for compensation for a period longer than 12
hours.
(b)  The record shall include:
(i)  the name and address of the person storing  the vehicle, vessel, or
outboard motor;
(ii)  a brief description of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, including
the name or make, identification number, and  license number shown by the
license plates; and
(iii) the mileage shown on the vehicle's odometer both upon arrival at and
upon its release from the public garage, impound lot, or impound yard, if the
vehicle is equipped with an odometer.
(2)  Every record kept under Subsection (1) shall be open to inspection by any
peace officer.
